Illinois, session 104th, SB1356.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Video 5Gaming Ethics and Political Contributions Prohibition Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose; application. 7    (a) The purpose of this Act is to promote transparency, 8prevent conflicts of interest, and protect the integrity of 9the democratic process by prohibiting directors, employees, 10investors, landlords, property owners, video game terminal 11operators, and their immediate family members from making 12political contributions to candidates, political 13organizations, political action committees, or independent 14expenditure committees that may directly or indirectly 15influence their financial interests.16    (b) This prohibition applies to entities benefiting from 17gaming licenses. 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "Board of directors" means the governing body of an entity 20that owns or operates a gaming location or leases property to 21such operators.22    "Gaming location investor" means an individual or entity   SB1356- 2 -LRB104 08115 LNS 18161 b1that holds a financial interest in a licensed gaming location, 2including the individual's or entity's immediate family 3members.4    "Immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic 5partner, parent, sibling, child, or any other relative 6residing in the same household as the individual.7    "Landlord" means an individual or entity that owns or 8manages a property and leases all or part of it to tenants, 9including gaming operators or video gaming location owners.10    "Municipal or county issuer" means a local governmental 11body, official, or regulatory entity responsible for approving 12or issuing gaming.13    "Political action committee" means any committee, 14organization, or entity organized for the purpose of raising 15or spending funds to influence political elections.16    "Video game terminal operator" means an individual or 17entity licensed to operate video gaming terminals. 18    Section 15. Prohibited contributions.19    (a) No video game terminal operator, landlord, or property 20owner, the board of directors or investors of a terminal 21operator, landlord, or property owner, or immediately family 22members of a terminal operator, landlord, or property owner 23may make a contribution to:24        (1) a municipal or county official responsible for 25    issuing gaming licenses; or  SB1356- 3 -LRB104 08115 LNS 18161 b1        (2) a political action committee that supports or is 2    affiliated with such officials.3    (b) The prohibition applies for a period of 10 years from 4the date of issuance or approval of the gaming license, tax 5increment financing district benefit, or zoning variance. 6    Section 20. Disclosure of benefits and contributions.7    (a) Any corporation, organization, or entity receiving 8benefits from a gaming license shall disclose the names of 9directors, employees, investors, landlords, and their 10immediate family members who receive a benefit to the 11appropriate governmental body. This disclosure shall be made 12annually and available for public inspection.13    (b) Political organizations, candidates, political action 14committees, and independent expenditure committees shall 15maintain records and disclose contributions from individuals 16or entities subject to the provisions of this Act. 17    Section 25. Penalties. 18    (a) Any person or entity found to have violated the 19provisions of this Act by making prohibited political 20contributions shall be subject to:21        (1) A civil penalty of up to $100,000.22        (2) Suspension or revocation of the gaming license or 23    associated with the violating party.24        (3) Ineligibility to receive future benefits from   SB1356- 4 -LRB104 08115 LNS 18161 b1    gaming licenses for a period of up to 5 years.2    (b) Any municipal or county official who knowingly accepts 3a prohibited political contribution shall be subject to:4        (1) An ethics investigation and potential action, 5    including removal from office.6        (2) Criminal penalties for repeated or intentional 7    violations, including imprisonment for up to one year. 8    Section 30. Enforcement.9    (a) The Illinois Gaming Board, the Illinois State Board of 10Elections, and the Illinois Ethics Commission are responsible 11for enforcement of this Act, including conducting 12investigations and imposing penalties.13    (b) The Attorney General may also prosecute a violation of 14this Act. 15    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 16severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.